Illinois, session 104th, HB4593.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $5,000,000,00, or so much thereof 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for the purpose of 7grants to public museums.  8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92026.